West Virginia, session 2026, HB4275.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Attorney General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 5, 1985, authorized under the authority of §46A-6A-8 of this code, relating to the Attorney General (the establishment and qualification of third-party dispute mechanisms, 142 CSR 03), is authorized with the amendment set forth below: On page 1, by adding a new subsection 1.6. to read as follows:	"1.6. Sunset Provision – This rule shall terminate and have no further force or effect on August 1, 2036."